Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3426
Rules and regulations, defined.

Rules and regulations means rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act by the board.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 26.